Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1042.
do enact as follows:AB1042,14Section 1. 343.14 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1042,2,45343.14 (3) Except as provided in sub. (3m), the department shall, as part of 6the application process, take a digital photograph including facial image capture of 7the applicant to comply with s. 343.17 (3) (a) 2. Except as provided in sub. (3m), no 1application may be processed without the photograph being taken. Except as 2provided in sub. (3m) and s. 343.165 (4) (d), in the case of renewal licenses, the 3photograph shall be taken once every 8 years, and shall coincide with the 4appearance for examination which is required under s. 343.16 (3) (a).AB1042,25Section 2. 343.16 (1) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1042,2,116343.16 (1) (a) 1. Except when examination by an authorized 3rd-party tester 7is permitted under pars. (b) to (c), the department shall examine every applicant for 8an operator’s license, including applicants for license renewal as provided in sub. (3) 9(a) and (b), and every applicant for authorization to operate a vehicle class or type 10for which the applicant does not hold currently valid authorization, other than an 11instruction permit.AB1042,312Section 3. 343.16 (3) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1042,2,1413343.16 (3) (title) Testing upon renewal; periodic testing of certain 14persons.AB1042,415Section 4. 343.16 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB1042,2,2116343.16 (3) (c) The department shall examine every person who holds an 17operator’s license and who is at least 75 years of age prior to the person’s 76th 18birthday and every 5 years thereafter. The examination shall consist of a test of the 19ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor 20vehicle. The department shall make provisions for giving examinations under this 21paragraph at examining stations in each county.AB1042,522Section 5. 343.25 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1042,3,423343.25 (7) When a person who has been ordered to submit to an examination 24under s. 343.16, is required to submit to an examination under s. 343. 16 (3) (c), or 1has been ordered to appear for either group or individual counseling or examination 2under s. 343.32 (2) fails or refuses to do so. Such The cancellation under this 3subsection shall continue until compliance with the order or requirement has been 4made or the order is rescinded.AB1042,3,55